Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 1. Process Generally

§§ 651-653.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 654.
Signing of original writs.

[Repealed.]

The signing of original writs is a ministerial act and may be done in advance of issuance. The signature of an attorney, except when he or she is the plaintiff, to a writ, pleading, notice of appeal, or other form, constitutes and shall be deemed security, by way of recognizance, for the issuance of such writ or the filing of such pleading, notice of appeal, or other form, and such attorney shall be liable to each defendant in the sum of $50.00 for writs returnable to a Superior Court.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 261

, § 5;

1965, No. 194

, § 10, eff. July 1, 1965, operative Feb. 1, 1967;

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972;

1973, No. 249

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. April 9, 1974;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 69.

§§ 655-658.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 659.
Repealed.
1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 111, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 660.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 661.
Repealed.
1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 111, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 662.
Signing citations attached to highway petitions.

Superior judges may sign citations returnable to the Superior Court in the county in which they reside, which are attached to petitions relative to highways.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 194

, § 10, eff. July 10, 1965, operative Feb. 1, 1967;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1973, No. 249

(Adj. Sess.), § 16, eff. April 9, 1974.